Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.428

Representation.

(1) A party to an adjudicative proceeding may participate personally or, if the party is a corporation or other artificial person, by a duly authorized representative.

(2) Whether or not participating in person, any party may be advised and represented at the party's own expense by counsel or, if permitted by provision of law, other representative.

[ 1989 c 175 s 15; 1988 c 288 s 407.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.